Missouri, session 2026, SB1067.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.528, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.529,
to read as follows:
537.529. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Uniform Public Expression Protection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Governmental unit", any city, county, or other
political subdivision of this state, or any department,
division, board, or other agency of any political
subdivision of this state;
(2) "Person", an individual, estate, trust,
partnership, business or nonprofit entity, governmental
unit, or other legal entity.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of
this section, the provisions of this section shall apply to
any cause of action asserted in a civil action against a
person based on the person's:
(1) Communication in a legislative, executive,
judicial, administrative, or other governmental proceeding;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1067 2
(2) Communication on an issue under consideration or
review in a legislative, executive, judicial,
administrative, or other governmental proceeding; or
(3) Exercise of the right of freedom of speech or of
the press, the right to assemble or petition, or the right
of association, guaranteed by the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of the state of Missouri, on a
matter of public concern.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
cause of action asserted:
(1) Against a governmental unit or an employee or
agent of a governmental unit acting or purporting to act in
an official capacity;
(2) By a governmental unit or an employee or agent of
a governmental unit acting in an official capacity to
enforce a law to protect against an imminent threat to
public health or safety; or
(3) Against a person primarily engaged in the business
of selling or leasing goods or services if the cause of
action arises out of a communication related to the person's
sale or lease of the goods or services.
As used in this subsection, the term "goods or services"
shall not include any dramatic, literary, musical,
political, journalistic, or artistic work.
5. No later than sixty days after a party is served
with a complaint, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party
claim, or other pleading that asserts a cause of action to
which this section applies, or at a later time upon a
showing of good cause, a party may file a special motion to
dismiss the cause of action or part of the cause of action.

SB 1067 3
6. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection:
(a) All other proceedings between the moving party and
responding party in an action, including discovery and a
pending hearing or motion, are stayed on the filing of a
motion under subsection 5 of this section; and
(b) On motion by the moving party, the court may stay:
a. A hearing or motion involving another party if the
ruling on the hearing or motion would adjudicate a legal or
factual issue that is material to the motion under
subsection 5 of this section; or
b. Discovery by another party if the discovery relates
to a legal or factual issue that is material to the motion
under subsection 5 of this section.
(2) A stay under subdivision (1) of this subsection
remains in effect until entry of an order ruling on the
motion filed under subsection 5 of this section and the
expiration of the time to appeal the order.
(3) If a party appeals from an order ruling on a
motion under subsection 5 of this section, all proceedings
between all parties in an action are stayed. The stay
remains in effect until the conclusion of the appeal.
(4) During a stay under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the court may allow limited discovery if a party
shows that specific information is necessary to establish
whether a party has satisfied or failed to satisfy a burden
imposed by subdivision (1) of subsection 9 of this section
and is not reasonably available without discovery.
(5) A motion for costs and expenses under subsection
12 of this section shall not be subject to a stay under this
section.

SB 1067 4
(6) A stay under this subsection does not affect a
party's ability to voluntarily dismiss a cause of action or
part of a cause of action or move to sever a cause of action.
(7) During a stay under this section, the court for
good cause may hear and rule on:
(a) A motion unrelated to the motion under subsection
5 of this section; and
(b) A motion seeking a special or preliminary
injunction to protect against an imminent threat to public
health or safety.
7. (1) The court shall hear a motion under subsection
5 of this section no later than sixty days after filing of
the motion, unless the court orders a later hearing:
(a) To allow discovery under subdivision (4) of
subsection 6 of this section; or
(b) For other good cause.
(2) If the court orders a later hearing under
paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
court shall hear the motion under subsection 5 of this
section no later than sixty days after the court order
allowing the discovery, subject to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
100 8. In ruling on a motion under subsection 5 of this
101 section, the court shall consider the parties' pleadings,
102 the motion, any replies and responses to the motion, and any
103 evidence that could be considered in ruling on a motion for
104 summary judgment.
105 9. (1) In ruling on a motion under subsection 5 of
106 this section, the court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause
107 of action or part of a cause of action if:
108 (a) The moving party establishes under subsection 3 of
109 this section that this section applies;

SB 1067 5
110 (b) The responding party fails to establish as
111 provided in subsection 4 of this section that this section
112 does not apply; and
113 (c) Either:
114 a. The responding party fails to establish a prima
115 facie case as to each essential element of the cause of
116 action; or
117 b. The moving party establishes that:
118 (i) The responding party failed to state a cause of
119 action upon which relief can be granted; or
120 (ii) There is no genuine issue as to any material fact
121 and the party is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on
122 the cause of action or part of the cause of action.
123 (2) A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a
124 responding party's cause of action, or part of a cause of
125 action, that is the subject of a motion under subsection 5
126 of this section does not affect a moving party's right to
127 obtain a ruling on the motion and seek costs, reasonable
128 attorney's fees, and reasonable litigation expenses under
129 subsection 12 of this section.
130 (3) A voluntary dismissal with prejudice of a
131 responding party's cause of action, or part of a cause of
132 action, that is the subject of a motion under subsection 5
133 of this section establishes for the purpose of subsection 12
134 of this section that the moving party prevailed on the
135 motion.
136 10. The court shall rule on a motion under subsection
137 5 of this section no later than sixty days after the hearing
138 under subsection 7 of this section.
139 11. A moving party may appeal within twenty-one days
140 as a matter of right from an order denying, in whole or in
141 part, a motion under subsection 5 of this section.

SB 1067 6
142 12. On a motion under subsection 5 of this section,
143 the court shall award costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and
144 reasonable litigation expenses related to the motion:
145 (1) To the moving party if the moving party prevails
146 on the motion; or
147 (2) To the responding party if the responding party
148 prevails on the motion and the court finds that the motion
149 was frivolous or filed solely with intent to delay the
150 proceeding.
151 13. This section shall be broadly construed and
152 applied to protect the exercise of the right of freedom of
153 speech and of the press, the right to assemble and petition,
154 and the right of association, guaranteed by the Constitution
155 of the United States or the Constitution of the state of
156 Missouri.
157 14. In applying and construing this section,
158 consideration shall be given to the need to promote
159 uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter
160 among states that enact it.
161 15. The provisions of this section shall apply to any
162 civil action filed, or any cause of action asserted in a
163 civil action, on or after August 28, 2026.
[537.528. 1. Any action against a person
for conduct or speech undertaken or made in
connection with a public hearing or public
meeting, in a quasi-judicial proceeding before a
tribunal or decision-making body of the state or
any political subdivision of the state is
subject to a special motion to dismiss, motion
for judgment on the pleadings, or motion for
summary judgment that shall be considered by the
court on a priority or expedited basis to ensure
the early consideration of the issues raised by
the motion and to prevent the unnecessary
expense of litigation. Upon the filing of any

SB 1067 7
special motion described in this subsection, all
discovery shall be suspended pending a decision
on the motion by the court and the exhaustion of
all appeals regarding the special motion.
2. If the rights afforded by this section
are raised as an affirmative defense and if a
court grants a motion to dismiss, a motion for
judgment on the pleadings or a motion for
summary judgment filed within ninety days of the
filing of the moving party's answer, the court
shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs
incurred by the moving party in defending the
action. If the court finds that a special
motion to dismiss or motion for summary judgment
is frivolous or solely intended to cause
unnecessary delay, the court shall award costs
and reasonable attorney fees to the party
prevailing on the motion.
3. Any party shall have the right to an
expedited appeal from a trial court order on the
special motions described in subsection 2 of
this section or from a trial court's failure to
rule on the motion on an expedited basis.
4. As used in this section, a "public
meeting in a quasi-judicial proceeding" means
and includes any meeting established and held by
a state or local governmental entity, including
without limitations meetings or presentations
before state, county, city, town or village
councils, planning commissions, review boards or
commissions.
5. Nothing in this section limits or
prohibits the exercise of a right or remedy of a
party granted pursuant to another
constitutional, statutory, common law or
administrative provision, including civil
actions for defamation.
6. If any provision of this section or the
application of any provision of this section to
a person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this section that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or

SB 1067 8
application, and to this end the provisions of
this section are severable.
7. The provisions of this section shall
apply to all causes of actions.]
✓